Utah statutes.
62A-4a-304.   Contracts for services.

(1) (a)  Contracts for services to prevent child abuse and neglect shall be awarded on the basis of probability of success, based in part on sound research data.

(b)  Each contract entered into by the director under Section 62A-4a-303 shall contain a provision for the evaluation of services provided under the contract.

(2)  Contract funds awarded for the treatment of victims of abuse and neglect are not a collateral source as described in Section 63M-7-502.

